Utah statutes.
63E-1-203.   Exemptions from committee activities.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Part 2 and Subsection 63E-1-102(4), the following independent entities are exempt from the study by the committee under Section 63E-1-202:

(1)  the Workers' Compensation Fund created in Title 31A, Chapter 33, Workers' Compensation Fund; and

(2)  the Utah Housing Corporation created in Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 7, Utah Housing Corporation Act.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

